Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202385-3211
Door to College Scholarship Fund; created; use; investment.

The Door to College Scholarship Fund is created. The commission shall administer the fund, which shall consist of amounts transferred from the State Lottery Operation Trust Fund pursuant to section 79-3501 prior to July 1, 2029, as well as any money transferred by the Legislature and gifts, grants, or bequests from any source, including federal, state, public, and private sources. All amounts accruing to the Door to College Scholarship Fund shall be used to carry out the Door to College Scholarship Act. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 2023, LB705, § 38.
July 1, 2023
Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.